Utah statutes.
48-2c-616 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Foreign limited liability company -- Series.

(1)  If a foreign limited liability company that is registering to do business in the state is governed by an operating agreement establishing or providing for the establishment of a series, that fact shall be stated on the application for authority to transact business in the state.

(2) (a)  A company shall identify on an application for authority to transact business in the state which of the protections for the series and company found in Section 48-2c-606 apply to a series.

(b)  If different protections found in Section 48-2c-606 apply to different series of a company, the application for authority to transact business in the state shall identify:

(i)  the protections that apply to each existing series; and

(ii)  the protections that will apply to any later-created series.

